Maryland, session 2026, HB1011.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) There is a Workgroup on Supporting Transgender and Gender Diverse
Students.
(b) The Workgroup consists of the following members:
(1) two members of the Senate of Maryland, one member who lives in a
rural jurisdiction and one member who lives in an urban jurisdiction, appointed by the
President of the Senate;
(2) two members of the House of Delegates, one member who lives in a
rural jurisdiction and one member who lives in an urban jurisdiction, appointed by the
Speaker of the House;
(3) one representative of the State Department of Education, appointed by
the State Superintendent of Schools;
(4) one representative of the Maryland Association of Boards of Education,
appointed by the Executive Director of the Association;
(5) one representative of the Public School Superintendents’ Association of
Maryland, appointed by the Executive Director of the Association;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1011*

HOUSE BILL 1011
(6) one representative of the Maryland School Psychologists’ Association,
appointed by the President of the Association;
(7) one representative of the Maryland State Education Association,
appointed by the Executive Director of the Association;
(8) one representative of the American Federation of Teachers, appointed
by the President of the Federation;
(9) one advisory member of the Office of the Attorney General, appointed
by the Attorney General;
(10) one member who is a student member of a county board of education in
the State, appointed by the State Superintendent;
(11) two members who are parents of children enrolled in public schools in
the State, appointed by the cochairs of the Workgroup; and
(12) two members of the Executive Branch of State government, appointed
by the Governor.
(c) One of the members appointed from the Senate of Maryland and one of the
members appointed from the House of Delegates shall serve as cochairs of the Workgroup.
(d) The State Department of Education shall provide staff for the Workgroup.
(e) A member of the Workgroup:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Workgroup; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) The Workgroup shall:
(1) study ways to support transgender and gender diverse students in
public schools in the State; and
(2) make recommendations regarding statewide statutory and regulatory
policies.
(g) On or before December 1, 2026, the Workgroup shall report its findings and
recommendations to the State Department of Education, the Governor, and, in accordance
with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly.

HOUSE BILL 1011 3
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and, at the end of June 30, 2027, this
Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no
further force and effect.